District of Columbia statutes.
47-1003

Disabled American Veterans.

The property situated in square 153 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lot 132, owned, occupied, and used by the Disabled American Veterans, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

May 15, 1946, 60 Stat. 181, ch. 257, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1003.
1973 Ed., § 47-801a-1.